Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2022
Visiting faculty permit, defined.

Visiting faculty permit means a permit for a physician qualified by virtue of previous medical training and experience to teach students of medicine, to conduct research, or both.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 680.